Georgia, session 2025_26, SB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to sale or distribution of harmful materials to minors, is amended by revising Code
Section 16-12-104, relating to library exception, as follows:
S. B. 74
- 1 -

LC 49 2294S (SCS)
"16-12-104.
The provisions of Code Section 16-12-103 shall not apply to any public library operated
by the state or any of its political subdivisions nor to any library operated as a part of any
school, college, or university Reserved."
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended in Code Section 16-12-105, relating to penalty, by revising
subsection (a) and by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, any person who knowingly
violates any provision of Code Section 16-12-103 or 16-12-104 shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature."
"(c) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this Code section if the person
charged is employed to work in a library operated by the state or any of its political
subdivisions or any library operated as a part of any school, college, or university, and such
individual can demonstrate that he or she has made a good faith attempt to identify and
remove from access to minors all physical or electronic material harmful to minors."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to any motions made or
hearings or trials commenced on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 74
- 2 -